Illinois, session 104th, SB3996.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Foreign Agents Registration Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to provide 7public transparency for the political and propaganda 8activities conducted by agents representing principals from 9foreign countries of concern. 10    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:11    "Person" means an individual, partnership, association, 12corporation, organization, or any other combination of 13individuals.14    "Foreign principal" means:15        (1) a government of a foreign country and a foreign 16    political party;17        (2) a person outside of the United States, unless it 18    is established that such person is an individual and a 19    citizen of and domiciled within the United States, or that 20    such person is not an individual and is organized under or 21    created by the laws of the United States or of any State or 22    other place subject to the jurisdiction of the United   SB3996- 2 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1    States and has its principal place of business within the 2    United States;3        (3) a partnership, association, corporation, 4    organization, or other combination of persons organized 5    under the laws of or having its principal place of 6    business in a foreign country; or7        (4) a partnership, association, corporation, 8    organization, or other combination of persons that is at 9    least 20% beneficially owned by a partnership, 10    association, corporation, organization, or other 11    combination of persons organized under the laws of or 12    having its principal place of business in a foreign 13    country. 14    "Agent of a foreign principal" means:15        (1) any person who acts as an agent, representative, 16    employee, or servant, or any person who acts in any other 17    capacity at the order, request, or under the direction or 18    control of a foreign principal or of a person any of whose 19    activities are directly or indirectly supervised, 20    directed, controlled, financed, or subsidized in whole or 21    in part by a foreign principal, and who directly or 22    through any other person:23            (i) engages within this State in political 24        activities for or in the interests of such foreign 25        principal;26            (ii) acts within this State as a public-relations   SB3996- 3 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1        counsel, publicity agent, information-service employee 2        or political consultant for or in the interests of 3        such foreign principal;4            (iii) within this State solicits, collects, 5        disburses, or dispenses contributions, loans, money, 6        or other things of value for or in the interest of such 7        foreign principal; or8            (iv) within this State represents the interests of 9        such foreign principal before any agency or official 10        of the government or of a unit of local government; and11        (2) any person who agrees, consents, assumes or 12    purports to act as, or who is or holds himself or herself 13    out to be, whether or not pursuant to contractual 14    relationship, an agent of a foreign principal as defined 15    in clause (1) of this definition.16    "Agent of a foreign principal" does not include any news 17or press service or association organized under the laws of 18the United States or of any State or other place subject to the 19jurisdiction of the United States, or any newspaper, magazine, 20periodical, or other publication for which there is on file 21with the United States Postal Service information in 22compliance with 39 U.S.C. 3611, published in the United 23States, solely by virtue of any bona fide news or journalistic 24activities, including the solicitation or acceptance of 25advertisements, subscriptions, or other compensation therefor, 26so long as it is at least 80% beneficially owned by, and its   SB3996- 4 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1officers and directors, if any, are citizens of the United 2States, and such news or press service or association, 3newspaper, magazine, periodical, or other publication, is not 4owned, directed, supervised, controlled, subsidized, or 5financed, and none of its policies are determined by any 6foreign principal defined in this Section, or by any agent of a 7foreign principal required to register under this Act.8    "Government of a foreign country" means any person or 9group of persons exercising sovereign de facto or de jure 10political jurisdiction over any country, other than the United 11States, or over any part of such country, and includes any 12subdivision of any such group and any group or agency to which 13such sovereign de facto or de jure authority or functions are 14directly or indirectly delegated. The term shall include any 15faction or body of insurgents within a country assuming to 16exercise governmental authority whether such faction or body 17of insurgents has or has not been recognized by the United 18States. 19    "Foreign political party" means any organization or any 20other combination of individuals in a country other than the 21United States, or any unit or branch thereof, having for an aim 22or purpose, or which is engaged in any activity devoted in 23whole or in part to, the establishment, administration, 24control, or acquisition of administration or control, of a 25government of a foreign country or a subdivision thereof, or 26the furtherance or influencing of the political or public   SB3996- 5 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1interests, policies, or relations of a government of a foreign 2country or a subdivision thereof. 3    "Public-relations counsel" means any person who engages 4directly or indirectly in informing, advising, or in any way 5representing a principal in any public relations matter 6pertaining to political or public interests, policies, or 7relations of such principal. 8    "Publicity agent" means any person who engages directly or 9indirectly in the publication or dissemination of oral, 10visual, graphic, written, or pictorial information or matter 11of any kind, including publication by means of advertising, 12books, periodicals, newspapers, lectures, broadcasts, motion 13pictures, or otherwise. 14    "Information-service employee" means any person who is 15engaged in furnishing, disseminating, or publishing accounts, 16descriptions, information, or data with respect to the 17political, industrial, employment, economic, social, cultural, 18or other benefits, advantages, facts, or conditions of any 19country other than the United States or of any government of a 20foreign country or of a foreign political party or of a 21partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other 22combination of individuals organized under the laws of, or 23having its principal place of business in, a foreign country. 24    "Registration statement" means the registration statement 25required to be filed with the Attorney General under Section 2615 or 20, and any supplements thereto required to be filed   SB3996- 6 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1under Section 15 or 20, and includes all documents and papers 2required to be filed therewith or amendatory thereof or 3supplemental thereto, whether attached thereto or incorporated 4therein by reference. 5    "United States", when used in a geographical sense, means 6the several States, the District of Columbia, the Territories, 7the insular possessions, and all other places now or hereafter 8subject to the civil or military jurisdiction of the United 9States. 10    "Prints" means newspapers and periodicals, books, 11pamphlets, sheet music, visiting cards, address cards, 12printing proofs, engravings, photographs, pictures, drawings, 13plans, maps, patterns to be cut out, catalogs, prospectuses, 14advertisements, and printed, engraved, lithographed, or 15autographed notices of various kinds, and, in general, all 16impressions or reproductions obtained on paper or other 17material assimilable to paper, on parchment or on cardboard, 18by means of printing, engraving, lithography, autography, or 19any other easily recognizable mechanical process, with the 20exception of the copying press, stamps with movable or 21immovable type, and the typewriter. 22    "Political activities" means any activity that the person 23engaging in believes will, or that the person intends to, in 24any way influence any agency or official of the State or a unit 25of local government, or any section of the public within this 26State with reference to formulating, adopting, or changing the   SB3996- 7 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1domestic or foreign policies of the United States or with 2reference to the political or public interests, policies, or 3relations of a government of a foreign country or a foreign 4political party. 5    "Political consultant" means any person who engages in 6informing or advising any other person with reference to the 7policies or the political or public interest, policies, or 8relations of a foreign country or of a foreign political 9party. 10    "Country of concern" means the People's Republic of China, 11the Russian Federation, the Islamic Republic of Iran, the 12Democratic People's Republic of Korea, the Republic of Cuba, 13the Venezuelan regime of Nicolas Maduro, or the Syrian Arab 14Republic, including any agent of or any other entity under 15significant control of such foreign country of concern, or any 16other entity deemed by the Governor in consultation with the 17Director of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and 18Office of Homeland Security. 19    Section 15. Requirements to register as a foreign agent. 20    (a) No person shall act as an agent of a foreign principal 21from a country of concern unless he or she has filed with the 22Attorney General a true and complete registration statement 23and supplements thereto as required by subsections (a) and (b) 24or unless he or she is exempt from registration under the 25provisions of this Act. Except as otherwise provided in the   SB3996- 8 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1Act, every person who becomes an agent of a foreign principal 2from a country of concern shall, within 10 days thereafter, 3file with the Attorney General, in duplicate, a registration 4statement, under oath on a form prescribed by the Attorney 5General. The obligation of an agent of a foreign principal 6from a country of concern to file a registration statement 7shall, after the 10th day of his or her becoming such agent, 8continue from day to day, and termination of such status shall 9not relieve such agent from his or her obligation to file a 10registration statement for the period during which he or she 11was an agent of a foreign principal from a country of concern. 12The registration statement shall include the following, which 13shall be regarded as material for the purposes of this 14subsection: 15        (1) registrant's name, principal business address, and 16    all other business addresses in the United States or 17    elsewhere, and all residence addresses, if any; 18        (2) status of the registrant; if an individual, 19    nationality; if a partnership, name, residence addresses, 20    and nationality of each partner and a true and complete 21    copy of its articles of copartnership; if an association, 22    corporation, organization, or any other combination of 23    individuals, the name, residence addresses, and 24    nationality of each director and officer and of each 25    person performing the functions of a director or officer 26    and a true and complete copy of its charter, articles of   SB3996- 9 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1    incorporation, association, constitution, and bylaws, and 2    amendments thereto; a copy of every other instrument or 3    document and a statement of the terms and conditions of 4    every oral agreement relating to its organization, powers, 5    and purposes; and a statement of its ownership and 6    control; 7        (3) a comprehensive statement of the nature of 8    registrant's business; a complete list of registrant's 9    employees and a statement of the nature of the work of 10    each; the name and address of every foreign principal from 11    a country of concern for whom the registrant is acting, 12    assuming or purporting to act or has agreed to act; the 13    character of the business or other activities of every 14    such foreign principal from a country of concern, and, if 15    any such foreign principal from a country of concern be 16    other than a natural person, a statement of the ownership 17    and control of each; and the extent, if any, to which each 18    such foreign principal from a country of concern is 19    supervised, directed, owned, controlled, financed, or 20    subsidized, in whole or in part, by any government of a 21    foreign country or foreign political party, or by any 22    other foreign principal from a country of concern; 23        (4) copies of each written agreement and the terms and 24    conditions of each oral agreement, including all 25    modifications of such agreements, or, where no contract 26    exists, a full statement of all the circumstances, by   SB3996- 10 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1    reason of which the registrant is an agent of a foreign 2    principal from a country of concern; a comprehensive 3    statement of the nature and method of performance of each 4    such contract, and of the existing and proposed activity 5    or activities engaged in or to be engaged in by the 6    registrant as agent of a foreign principal from a country 7    of concern for each such foreign principal from a country 8    of concern, including a detailed statement of any such 9    activity which is a political activity; 10        (5) the nature and amount of contributions, income, 11    money, or thing of value, if any, that the registrant has 12    received within the preceding 180 days from each such 13    foreign principal from a country of concern, either as 14    compensation or for disbursement or otherwise, and the 15    form and time of each such payment and from whom received; 16        (6) a detailed statement of every activity which the 17    registrant is performing or is assuming or purporting or 18    has agreed to perform for himself, herself, or any other 19    person other than a foreign principal from a country of 20    concern and which requires his registration hereunder, 21    including a detailed statement of any such activity which 22    is a political activity; 23        (7) the name, business, and residence addresses, and 24    if an individual, the nationality, of any person other 25    than a foreign principal from a country of concern for 26    whom the registrant is acting, assuming or purporting to   SB3996- 11 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1    act or has agreed to act under such circumstances as 2    require his or her registration hereunder; the extent to 3    which each such person is supervised, directed, owned, 4    controlled, financed, or subsidized, in whole or in part, 5    by any government of a foreign country or foreign 6    political party or by any other foreign principal from a 7    country of concern; and the nature and amount of 8    contributions, income, money, or thing of value, if any, 9    that the registrant has received during the preceding 180 10    days from each such person in connection with any of the 11    activities referred to in clause (6) of this subsection, 12    either as compensation or for disbursement or otherwise, 13    and the form and time of each such payment and from whom 14    received; 15        (8) a detailed statement of the money and other things 16    of value spent or disposed of by the registrant during the 17    preceding 180 days in furtherance of or in connection with 18    activities which require his or her registration hereunder 19    and which have been undertaken by him either as an agent of 20    a foreign principal from a country of concern or for 21    himself or any other person or in connection with any 22    activities relating to his becoming an agent of such 23    principal from a country of concern, and a detailed 24    statement of any contributions of money or other things of 25    value made by him during the preceding 180 days (other 26    than contributions the making of which is prohibited under   SB3996- 12 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1    the terms of 18 U.S.C. 613 in connection with an election 2    to any political office or in connection with any primary 3    election, convention, or caucus held to select candidates 4    for any political office); 5        (9) copies of each written agreement and the terms and 6    conditions of each oral agreement, including all 7    modifications of such agreements, or, where no contract 8    exists, a full statement of all the circumstances, by 9    reason of which the registrant is performing or assuming 10    or purporting or has agreed to perform for himself or for a 11    foreign principal from a country of concern or for any 12    person other than a foreign principal from a country of 13    concern any activities which require his or her 14    registration hereunder; 15        (10) such other statements, information, or documents 16    pertinent to the purposes of this subsection as the 17    Attorney General, having due regard for the national 18    security and the public interest, may from time to time 19    require; and20        (11) such further statements and such further copies 21    of documents as are necessary to make the statements made 22    in the registration statement and supplements thereto, and 23    the copies of documents furnished therewith, not 24    misleading. 25    (b) Every agent of a foreign principal from a country of 26concern who has filed a registration statement required by   SB3996- 13 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1subsection (a) shall, within 30 days after the expiration of 2each period of 6 months succeeding such filing, file with the 3Attorney General a supplement thereto under oath, on a form 4prescribed by the Attorney General, which shall set forth with 5respect to such preceding 6 months' period such facts as the 6Attorney General, having due regard for the national security 7and the public interest, may deem necessary to make the 8information required under this Section accurate, complete, 9and current with respect to such period. In connection with 10the information furnished under clauses (3), (4), (6), and (9) 11of subsection (a), the registrant shall give notice to the 12Attorney General of any changes therein within 10 days after 13such changes occur. If the Attorney General, having due regard 14for the national security and the public interest, determines 15that it is necessary to carry out the purposes of this Act, the 16Attorney General may, in any particular case, require 17supplements to the registration statement to be filed at more 18frequent intervals in respect to all or particular items of 19information to be furnished. 20    (c) The registration statement and supplements thereto 21shall be executed under oath as follows: If the registrant is 22an individual, by him or her; if the registrant is a 23partnership, by the majority of the members thereof; if the 24registrant is a person other than an individual or a 25partnership, by a majority of the officers thereof or persons 26performing the functions of officers or by a majority of the   SB3996- 14 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1board of directors thereof or persons performing the functions 2of directors, if any. 3    (d) The fact that a registration statement or supplement 4thereto has been filed shall not necessarily be deemed a full 5compliance with this Act and the rules thereunder on the part 6of the registrant; nor shall it indicate that the Attorney 7General has in any way passed upon the merits of such 8registration statement or supplement thereto; nor shall it 9preclude prosecution, as provided for in this Act, for willful 10failure to file a registration statement or supplement thereto 11when due or for a willful false statement of a material fact 12therein or the willful omission of a material fact required to 13be stated therein or the willful omission of a material fact or 14copy of a material document necessary to make the statements 15made in a registration statement and supplements thereto, and 16the copies of documents furnished therewith, not misleading. 17    (e) If any agent of a foreign principal from a country of 18concern, required to register under the provisions of this 19Act, has previously thereto registered with the Attorney 20General under this Act, the Attorney General, in order to 21eliminate inappropriate duplication, may permit the 22incorporation by reference in the registration statement or 23supplements thereto filed hereunder of any information or 24documents previously filed by such agent of a foreign 25principal from a country of concern under the provisions of 26said section.   SB3996- 15 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1    Section 20. Retroactive transparency. Any person who acted 2as an agent of a foreign principal from a country of concern at 3any time after January 1, 2014 and until the effective date of 4this Act shall file with the Attorney General a true and 5complete retroactive registration statement and supplements 6thereto as required under Section 15. 7    Section 25. Exemptions. The requirements of Sections 15 8and Section 20 of this Act do not apply to the following agents 9of foreign principals: 10        (1) a duly accredited diplomatic or consular officer 11    of a foreign government who is so recognized by the United 12    States Department of State, while said officer is engaged 13    exclusively in activities which are recognized by the 14    United States Department of State as being within the 15    scope of the functions of such officer; 16        (2) any official of a foreign government, if such 17    government is recognized by the United States, who is not 18    a public-relations counsel, publicity agent, 19    information-service employee, or a citizen of the United 20    States, whose name and status and the character of whose 21    duties as such official are of public record in the United 22    States Department of State, while the official is engaged 23    exclusively in activities which are recognized by the 24    Department of State as being within the scope of the   SB3996- 16 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1    functions of such official; 2        (3) any member of the staff of, or any person employed 3    by, a duly accredited diplomatic or consular officer of a 4    foreign government who is so recognized by the United 5    States Department of State, other than a public-relations 6    counsel, publicity agent, or information-service employee, 7    whose name and status and the character of whose duties as 8    such member or employee are of public record in the United 9    States Department of State, while said member or employee 10    is engaged exclusively in the performance of activities 11    which are recognized by the United States Department of 12    State as being within the scope of the functions of such 13    member or employee; and14        (4) any person qualified to practice law in this 15    State, insofar as the person engages or agrees to engage 16    in the legal representation of a disclosed foreign 17    principal from a country of concern before any State court 18    of law or any agency of the government of the State or a 19    unit of local government; provided, that for the purposes 20    of this Act legal representation does not include attempts 21    to influence or persuade agency personnel or officials 22    other than in the course of judicial proceedings, criminal 23    or civil law enforcement inquiries, investigations, or 24    proceedings, or agency proceedings required by statute or 25    rule to be conducted on the record.   SB3996- 17 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1    Section 30. Filing and labeling of informational 2materials. 3    (a) Every person within this State who is an agent of a 4foreign principal from a country of concern and who is 5required to register under the provisions of this Act and who 6transmits or causes to be transmitted in the United States 7mails or by any means or instrumentality of interstate or 8foreign commerce any informational materials for or in the 9interests of such foreign principal from a country of concern 10(i) in the form of prints, or (ii) in any other form which is 11reasonably adapted to being, or which the person believes will 12be, or which the person intends to be, disseminated or 13circulated among 2 or more persons shall, not later than 48 14hours after the beginning of the transmittal thereof, file 15with the Attorney General 2 copies thereof. 16    (b) It is unlawful for any person within the United States 17who is an agent of a foreign principal from a country of 18concern and required to register under the provisions of this 19Act to transmit or cause to be transmitted in the United States 20mails or by any means or instrumentality of interstate or 21foreign commerce any informational materials for or in the 22interests of such foreign principal from a country of concern 23without placing in such informational materials a conspicuous 24statement that the materials are distributed by the agent on 25behalf of the foreign principal from a country of concern, and 26that additional information is on file with the Attorney   SB3996- 18 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1General. The Attorney General may by rule define what 2constitutes a conspicuous statement for the purposes of this 3Section. 4    (c) The copies of informational materials required by this 5Section to be filed with the Attorney General shall be 6available for public inspection under such rules as Attorney 7General may prescribe. 8    (d) It is unlawful for any person within this State who is 9an agent of a foreign principal from a country of concern 10required to register under the provisions of this Act to 11transmit, convey, or otherwise furnish to any agency or 12official of the government of this State (including a member 13or committee of either House of the General Assembly or a 14member or committee of a unit of local government) for or in 15the interests of such foreign principal from a country of 16concern any political propaganda or to request from any such 17agency or official for or in the interests of such foreign 18principal from a country of concern any information or advice 19with respect to any matter pertaining to the political or 20public interests, policies or relations of a foreign country 21of concern or of a political party from a country of concern or 22pertaining to the foreign or domestic policies of the United 23States or this State unless the propaganda or the request is 24prefaced or accompanied by a true and accurate statement to 25the effect that such person is registered as an agent of such 26foreign principal from a country of concern under this Act.   SB3996- 19 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1    (e) Whenever any agent of a foreign principal from a 2country of concern required to register under this Section 3appears before any committee of the General Assembly or a unit 4of local government to testify for or in the interests of such 5foreign principal from a country of concern, the agent shall, 6at the time of such appearance, furnish the committee with a 7copy of his most recent registration statement filed with the 8Attorney General as an agent of such foreign principal from a 9country of concern for inclusion in the records of the 10committee as part of the agent's testimony. 11    Section 35. Maintenance of books and records. Every agent 12of a foreign principal from a country of concern registered 13under this Act shall keep and preserve while the person is an 14agent of a foreign principal from a country of concern such 15books of account and other records with respect to all his 16activities, the disclosure of which is required under the 17provisions of this Act, in accordance with such business and 18accounting practices, as the Attorney General, having due 19regard for the national security and the public interest, may 20by rule prescribe as necessary or appropriate for the 21enforcement of the provisions of this Act and shall preserve 22the same for a period of 3 years following the termination of 23such status. Until rules are in effect under this Section 24every agent of a foreign principal from a country of concern 25shall keep books of account and shall preserve all written   SB3996- 20 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1records with respect to his activities. Such books and records 2shall be open at all reasonable times to the inspection of any 3official charged with the enforcement of this Act. It shall be 4unlawful for any person knowingly to conceal, destroy, 5obliterate, mutilate, or falsify, or to attempt to conceal, 6destroy, obliterate, mutilate, or falsify, or to cause to be 7concealed, destroyed, obliterated, mutilated, or falsified, 8any books or records required to be kept under the provisions 9of this Act. 10    Section 40. Public transparency and examination of 11official records.12    (a) The Attorney General shall retain in permanent form 13one copy of all registration statements furnished under this 14Act, and the same shall be public records and open to public 15examination and inspection at such reasonable hours, under 16such rules, as the Attorney General may prescribe, and copies 17of the same shall be furnished to every applicant at such 18reasonable fee as the Attorney General may prescribe. 19    (b) The Attorney General shall, promptly upon receipt, 20transmit one copy of every registration statement filed 21hereunder and one copy of every amendment or supplement 22thereto filed hereunder, to the United States Secretary of 23State for such comment and use as the United States Secretary 24of State may determine to be appropriate from the point of view 25of the foreign relations of the United States. Failure of the   SB3996- 21 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1Attorney General so to transmit such copy shall not be a bar to 2prosecution under this Act. 3    (c) The Attorney General is authorized to furnish to 4departments and agencies in the executive branch and 5committees of the General Assembly such information obtained 6by the Attorney General in the administration of this Act, 7including the names of registrants under this Act, copies of 8registration statements, or parts thereof, or other documents 9or information filed under this Act, as may be appropriate in 10the light of the purposes of this Act. 11    (d) The Attorney General shall every 6 months report to 12the General Assembly concerning administration of this Act, 13including registrations filed pursuant to this Act, and the 14nature, sources and content of political propaganda 15disseminated and distributed. 16    (e) The Attorney General shall every month report on a web 17portal administered by the Attorney General concerning 18administration of this Act, including registrations filed 19pursuant to this Act, and the nature, sources and content of 20political propaganda disseminated and distributed. 21    Section 45. Liability of officers. Each officer, or person 22performing the functions of an officer, and each director, or 23person performing the functions of a director, of an agent of a 24foreign principal from a country of concern which is not an 25individual shall be under obligation to cause such agent to   SB3996- 22 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1execute and file a registration statement and supplements 2thereto as and when such filing is required under subsections 3(a) and (b) of Section 15 or of Section 20 and shall also be 4under obligation to cause such agent to comply with all the 5requirements of Sections 30 and 35 and all other requirements 6of this Act. Dissolution of any organization acting as an 7agent of a foreign principal from a country of concern shall 8not relieve any officer, or person performing the functions of 9an officer, or any director, or person performing the 10functions of a director, from complying with the provisions of 11this Section. In case of failure of any such agent of a foreign 12principal from a country of concern to comply with any of the 13requirements of this Act, each of its officers, or persons 14performing the functions of officers, and each of its 15directors, or persons performing the functions of directors, 16shall be subject to prosecution therefore. 17    Section 50. Enforcement and penalties. 18    (a) A person is guilty of a Class 3 felony and shall, in 19addition to a term of imprisonment, upon conviction thereof, 20may be fined not more than $100,000 if the person:21        (1) knowingly violates any provision of this Act or 22    any rule thereunder; or 23        (2) in any registration statement or supplement 24    thereto or in any other document filed with or furnished 25    to the Attorney General under the provisions of this Act   SB3996- 23 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1    knowingly makes a false statement of a material fact or 2    knowingly omits any material fact required to be stated 3    therein or knowingly omits a material fact or a copy of a 4    material document necessary to make the statements therein 5    and the copies of documents furnished therewith not 6    misleading. 7    (a-1) A person who violates Section 30 or subsection (g) 8of this Section is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for which a 9fine of not more than $50,000 may be imposed.10    (b) Any person who is a student, faculty member, 11researcher, adjunct, or otherwise employed or associated with 12a university in this State who:13        (1) knowingly violates any provision of this Act or 14    any rule thereunder; or 15        (2) in any registration statement or supplement 16    thereto or in any other document filed with or furnished 17    to the Attorney General under the provisions of this 18    subsection knowingly makes a false statement of a material 19    fact or knowingly omits any material fact required to be 20    stated therein or knowingly omits a material fact or a 21    copy of a material document necessary to make the 22    statements therein and the copies of documents furnished 23    therewith not misleading, 24shall, upon conviction thereof, be expelled or dismissed from 25any role with an institution of higher education in this State 26and shall be prohibited from entering any campus in this   SB3996- 24 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1State.2    Each institution of higher education in this State shall 3adopt a policy for expulsion or dismissal of individuals found 4in violation of this Act. 5    (c) In any proceeding under this Act in which it is charged 6that a person is an agent of a foreign principal from a country 7of concern with respect to a foreign principal outside of the 8United States, proof of the specific identity of the foreign 9principal from a country of concern shall be permissible but 10not necessary. 11    (d) Any alien who shall be convicted of a violation of, or 12a conspiracy to violate, any provision of this Act or any rule 13thereunder shall be subject to referral to the United States 14Department of Justice for removal pursuant to Chapter 4 of 15Title II of the Immigration and Nationality Act. 16    (e) Failure to file any such registration statement or 17supplements thereto as is required by either subsection (a) or 18(b) of Section 15 shall be considered a continuing offense for 19as long as such failure exists, notwithstanding any statute of 20limitation or other statute to the contrary. 21    (f) Whenever in the judgment of the Attorney General any 22person is engaged in or about to engage in any acts which 23constitute or will constitute a violation of any provision of 24this Act, or rules issued thereunder, or whenever any agent of 25a foreign principal from a country of concern fails to comply 26with any of the provisions of this Act or the rules issued   SB3996- 25 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1thereunder, or otherwise is in violation of the Act, the 2Attorney General may make application to the appropriate state 3court for an order enjoining such acts or enjoining such 4person from continuing to act as an agent of such foreign 5principal from a country of concern, or for an order requiring 6compliance with any appropriate provision of the Act or rule 7thereunder. The circuit court shall have jurisdiction and 8authority to issue a temporary or permanent injunction, 9restraining order, or such other order which it may deem 10proper. 11    (g) If the Attorney General determines that a registration 12statement does not comply with the requirements of this Act or 13the rules issued thereunder, the Attorney General shall so 14notify the registrant in writing, specifying in what respects 15the statement is deficient. It shall be unlawful for any 16person to act as an agent of a foreign principal from a country 17of concern at any time 10 days or more after receipt of such 18notification without filing an amended registration statement 19in full compliance with the requirements of this Act and the 20rules issued thereunder. 21    (h) It is unlawful for any agent of a foreign principal 22from a country of concern required to register under this Act 23to be a party to any contract, agreement, or understanding, 24either express or implied, with such foreign principal from a 25country of concern pursuant to which the amount or payment of 26the compensation, fee, or other remuneration of such agent is   SB3996- 26 -LRB104 18746 RLC 32189 b1contingent in whole or in part upon the success of any 2political activities carried on by such agent. 3    Section 55. Rules. The Attorney General may at any time 4adopt such rules and forms as he or she may deem necessary to 5carry out the provisions of this Act.